Illinois, session 104th, HB2990.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Video Gaming Act is amended by changing 5Sections 27 and 65 as follows: 6    (230 ILCS 40/27)7    Sec. 27. Prohibition of video gaming by political 8subdivision. 9    (a) A municipality may pass an ordinance prohibiting video 10gaming within the corporate limits of the municipality. A 11county board may, for the unincorporated area of the county, 12pass an ordinance prohibiting video gaming within the 13unincorporated area of the county.14    (b) On and after July 1, 2022, a qualified fraternal 15organization that derives its charter from a national 16fraternal organization and a qualified veterans organization 17that derives its charter from a national veterans organization 18shall be eligible to apply to the Board for a license allowing 19video gaming as a licensed fraternal establishment or a 20licensed veterans establishment if the proposed fraternal 21establishment or veterans establishment is located in:22        (1) a municipality having a population of not more 23    than 1,000,000 that has enacted an ordinance prohibiting   HB2990- 2 -LRB104 09505 LNS 19568 b1    video gaming within the corporate limits; or2        (2) a county having a population of not more than 3    1,000,000 that has enacted an ordinance prohibiting video 4    gaming within the unincorporated area of the county.5    If the license is granted by the Board, then the licensed 6fraternal establishment or licensed veterans establishment may 7operate video gaming terminals pursuant to this Act.8    (c) No home rule unit of local government with a 9population of over 1,000,000, based on the 2000 U.S. Census, 10may enforce any local ordinance passed prior to the effective 11date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly 12prohibiting the operation of video gaming terminals within the 13corporate limits of the municipality. This subsection (c) is a 14denial and limitation of home rule powers and functions under 15subsection (g) of Section 6 of Article VII of the Illinois 16Constitution. 17(Source: P.A. 102-689, eff. 12-17-21.) 18    (230 ILCS 40/65)19    Sec. 65. Fees.20    (a) A non-home rule unit of government may not impose any 21fee for the operation of a video gaming terminal in excess of 22$250 per year.23    (b) A home rule unit of government with a population of 24over 1,000,000, based on the 2000 U.S. Census, may not impose 25any fee for the operation of a video gaming terminal in excess   HB2990- 3 -LRB104 09505 LNS 19568 b1of $250 per year. This subsection (b) is a denial and 2limitation of home rule powers and functions under subsection 3(g) of Section 6 of Article VII of the Illinois Constitution. 4    (c) The cost of any fee imposed under subsections (a) and 5(b) of this Act by any home rule unit of government or non-home 6rule unit of government shall be shared equally between the 7terminal operator and the applicable licensed establishment, 8licensed veterans establishment, licensed truck stop 9establishment, licensed large truck stop establishment, or 10licensed fraternal establishment under this Act. This 11subsection (c) is a denial and limitation of home rule powers 12and functions under subsection (g) of Section 6 of Article VII 13of the Illinois Constitution. 14(Source: P.A. 101-337, eff. 1-1-20; 102-689, eff. 12-17-21.)